Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.390

Duties of president.

The president of The Evergreen State College shall have general supervision of the college and see that all laws and rules of the board of trustees are observed.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 81; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.390. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 253 s 7; RRS s 4610; prior: 1897 c 118 s 218; 1893 c 107 s 7. Formerly RCW 28.81.110.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.